src/fst/phonology.twolc
!uit-mac-443:lang-fit ttr000$ cat misc/freebound.list |grep '^.m[lnrv][aeiouyäö]$'|cut -c2,3|sort|uniq

"Gemination 0:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:j <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow j _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

"Gemination 0:k"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:k <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow k _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tek0e>e
!!€ tekke>e

"Gemination 0:l"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:l <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow l _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tul0e>e
!!€ tulle>e

"Gemination 0:m"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:m <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow m _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

"Gemination 0:n"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:n <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!     [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ; !TESTAR TA BORT här på alla 0:Cns
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow n _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

"Gemination 0:p"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:p <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow p _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

"Gemination 0:s"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:s <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h) :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
 !       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ o:  %^HMETA: %> h: :o :o ; ! issoon
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow s _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ is0o^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ iss00>0oon



"h:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
h:0 <=>        Vow [p|t|k]                  _ e WeakGrade ;
	[.#.|Cns] Vow s :s Vow: %^HMETA: %> _ %^V: %^V: ; ! issoon
                                      Vow h _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ; 
  Vow Vow   :h [l|m|n|r|v] e:   %^WG:    %> _ e e ; ! BEHÖVS?
!Rules for metathesis type two, position 1 in Kuoppa/Mantila (efter två tonande Cns)
        Vow   l   :h [j|  m|n|r|v] Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! ilhmaa lm, lv, 
        Vow   r   :h [j|  m|n  |v] Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! Norhjaan
        Vow   n   :h  l          Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! 
        Vow   m   :h  n          Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! 
!Rules for metathesis type two, position 2 (efter syll m huvudbetoning & Vow Vow) (ingår även i P3)
        ![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Vow :h [l|m|n|r|v] Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! puohleen, sauhnaan
        ![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow VowNotI :h j Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; ! luohjaan
!Rules for metathesis type two, position 3 (efter ej huvudbetonad syll m Vow Vow)
        Vow (%>) Vow   :h [l|m|n|r|v] (Vow:) %^HMET2: %> _ ; !aikoihnaan, sairaahlaan (efter syll utan huvudbetoning & Vow Vow)
        Vow (%>) VowNotI   :h j Vow: %^HMET2: %> _ ; !aluohjaan (efter syll utan huvudbetoning & Vow Vow)
!!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4-6 (pe-se/mhaan OCH an-tah/maan öppen/sluten betonad + kort obetonad)
        Vow+ Cns+ Vow (%>) %^HMET2: (%>) :h [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] _ Vow Vow ; !mostly verbs; neuvotele>hmaan, tulehmaan, olehmaan
        Vow+ Cns+ Vow (%>) :h [l|m|n|r|v|%^N:] (Vow:) %^HMET2: (%>)  _ :Vow :Vow ; !mostly nouns; elämä, elämhään/elähmään
!!Rules for metathesis type two, position 4 (efter kort bet öppen syll + kort sonorantsluten syll; pe-sem-hään, ju-te-lem-haan men ej antahmaan)
        ![.#.|#] (Cns) Vow Cns Vow :h [l|m|n|r|v] (Vow:) %^HMET2: %>  _ :Vow :Vow ; !nouns; elämä, elämhään/elähmään !endast öppna stavelser
        ![.#.|#] (Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ Cns) (Cns) Vow Cns (Cns) Vow (%>) %^HMET2: (%>) :h [l|m|n|r|v] _ Vow Vow ; !Verbs; neuvotele>hmaan, tulehmaan, olehmaan  
       


!!€ rasta^HMETA>h^Vn

! issoon, sillhoon <== check this.


!"hm to mh for InfMa Ill after short vowel 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!h:m <=> Cns Vow %> _ m: %^A: %^A: ;

!"mh to hm for InfMa Ill after short vowel 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
!m:h <=> Cns Vow %> h: _ %^A: %^A: ;

!! kasva>hm^A^An
!! kasva>mhaan

!! saarna>^A>hm^A^An
!! saarna>a>hmaan

!! tule>hm^A^An
!! tule>mhaan

!! ## Gemination rules

"Gemination 0:t"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:t <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :a (Dummy:) %>  :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :e (Dummy:) %>  :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :i (Dummy:) %>  :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :u (Dummy:) %>  :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :y (Dummy:) %>  :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :ä (Dummy:) %>  :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _  :ö (Dummy:) %>  :ö ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) :a :a ;  ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow t _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ pit0ä>^A
!!€ pittä>ä

"Gemination 0:v"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
0:v <=> [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :a (Dummy:) %> (h)  :a ;   ! [:a|i2:|%^V:] ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ a:  (Dummy:) %> (h) [:a|:i] [:a|:i] ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :e (Dummy:) %> (h) :e ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ e:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :e :e ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :i (Dummy:) %> (h) :i ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ i:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :i :i ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ o   (Dummy:) %> (h) :o  ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ o:  %^HMETA: %>  h  :o :o ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :u (Dummy:) %> (h) :u  ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ u:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :u :u ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :y (Dummy:) %> (h) :y  ;
!       [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ y:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :y :y ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :ä (Dummy:) %> (h) :ä ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ ä:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ä :ä ;
        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _  :ö (Dummy:) %> (h) :ö ;
!        [.#.|#] Cns:* Vow v _ ö:  (Dummy:) %>  h  :ö :ö  ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kuv0a^HMETA>hiin
!!€ kuvv00>hiin



!! ### Assimilation rules

!! These are assimilation rules for *n* on suffix borders of LNRS consonant stems.
!! There is also a rule **j:0** avoiding a *lji* sequence.

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem l"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**

 %^N:l <=> l: %> _ ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ tul>^N^U
!!€ tul>lu
